Missouri, session 2026, HB2956.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 544, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 544.255, to read as follows:
544.255. 1. If a case is:
(1) Set for preliminary hearing but is dismissed by the court prior to the hearing
being held; or
(2) Dismissed by a prosecuting attorney at any time,

the case may be refiled by the prosecuting attorney.
2. If the case is dismissed by the court or the prosecuting attorney a second time,
the prosecuting attorney is prohibited from refiling the case.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.